en: magnesium malate
de: Magnesiummalat
sv: magnesiummalat

en: magnesium hydroxide
bg: Магнезиев хидроксид
cs: hydroxid hořečnatý
de: Magnesiumhydroxid
el: υδροξείδιο του μαγνησίου
es: hidróxido de magnesio
et: magneesiumhüdroksiid
fi: magnesiumhydroksidi
fr: hydroxyde de magnésium
hu: magnézium-hidroxid
it: idrossido di magnesio
ja: 水酸化マグネシウム
lt: magnio hidroksidas
lv: magnija hidroksīds
mt: idrossidu tal-manjesju
nl: magnesiumhydroxide
pl: wodorotlenek magnezu
pt: hidróxido de magnésio
ro: hidroxid de magneziu
sk: hydroxid horečnatý
sl: magnezijev hidroksid
sv: magnesiumhydroxid

en: magnesium oxide
bg: Магнезиев оксид
cs: oxid hořečnatý
de: Magnesiumoxid
el: οξείδιο του μαγνησίου
es: óxido de magnesio
et: magneesiumoksiid
fi: magnesiumoksidi
fr: oxyde de magnésium
hu: magnézium-oxid
it: ossido di magnesio
ja: 酸化マグネシウム
lt: magnio oksidas
lv: magnija oksīds
mt: ossidu tal-manjesju
nl: magnesiumoxide
pl: tlenek magnezu
pt: óxido de magnésio
ro: oxid de magneziu
sk: oxid horečnatý
sl: magnezijev oksid
sv: magnesiumoxid

en: magnesium sulfate
ar: كبريتات المغنسيوم
az: Acı duz
bg: Магнезиев сулфат
ca: sulfat de magnesi
cs: síran hořečnatý
de: Magnesiumsulfat
el: θειικό μαγνήσιο
eo: magnezia sulfato
es: sulfato de magnesio
et: magneesiumsulfaat
fa: منیزیم سولفات
fi: magnesiumsulfaatti
fr: sulfate de magnésium
he: מגנזיום גופרתי
hi: मैग्निसियम सल्फेट
hu: magnézium-szulfát
hy: Մագնեզիումի սուլֆատ
id: Magnesium sulfat
it: solfato di magnesio
ja: 硫酸マグネシウム
ko: 황산 마그네슘
ky: Магний сульфаты
lt: magnio sulfatas
lv: magnija sulfāts
mk: Магнезиум сулфат
ml: മഗ്നീഷ്യം സൾഫേറ്റ്
ms: Magnesium sulfat
mt: sulfat tal-manjesju
nb: Magnesiumsulfat
nl: magnesiumsulfaat
nn: magnesiumsulfat
pl: siarczan magnezu
pt: sulfato de magnésio
ro: sulfat de magneziu
ru: гептагидрат сульфата магния
sh: Magnezijum sulfat
sk: síran horečnatý
sl: magnezijev sulfat
sr: магнезијум сулфат
sv: magnesiumsulfat
ta: மக்னீசியம் சல்பேட்டு
th: แมกนีเซียมซัลเฟต
tr: Magnezyum sülfat
uk: Сульфат магнію
vi: Magie sulphat
zh: 硫酸镁

en: magnesium L-aspartate
bg: Магнезиев L-аспартат
cs: L-aspartát hořečnatý
de: Magnesium-L-aspartat
el: L-ασπαρτικό μαγνήσιο
es: L-aspartato de magnesio
et: magneesium-L-aspartaat
fi: magnesium-L-aspartaatti
fr: L-aspartate de magnésium
hu: magnézium-L-aszpartát
it: L-aspartato di magnesio
lt: magnio L-aspartatas
lv: magnija L-aspartāts
mt: L-aspartat tal-manjesju
nl: magnesium-L-aspartaat
pl: L-asparaginian magnezu
pt: L-aspartato de magnésio
ro: L-aspartat de magneziu
sk: L-aspartan horečnatý
sl: magnezijev L-aspartat
sv: magnesium-L-aspartat

en: magnesium bisglycinate
bg: Магнезиев бисглицинат
cs: bisglycinát hořečnatý
de: Magnesiumbisglycinat
el: διγλυκινικό μαγνήσιο
es: bisglicinato de magnesio
et: magneesiumdiglütsinaat
fi: magnesiumbisglysinaatti
fr: bisglycinate de magnésium
hu: magnézium-biszglicinát
it: bisglicinato di magnesio
lt: magnio bisglicinatas
lv: magnija bisglicināts
mt: bisgliċinat tal-manjesju
nl: magnesiumbisglycinaat
pl: diglicynian magnezu
pt: bisglicinato de magnésio
ro: bisglicinat de magneziu
sk: bisglycinát horečnatý
sl: magnezijev bisglicinat
sv: magnesiumbisglycinat

en: magnesium L-pidolate
bg: Магнезиев L-пидолат
cs: L-pyroglutaman (pidolát) hořečnatý
de: Magnesium-L-pidolat
el: L-πιδολικό μαγνήσιο
es: L-pidolato de magnesio
et: magneesium-L-pidolaat
fi: magnesium-L-pidolaatti
fr: L-pidolate de magnésium
hu: magnézium-L-pidolát
it: L-pidolato di magnesio
lt: magnio L-pidolatas
lv: magnija L-pidolāts
mt: L-pidolat tal-manjesju
nl: magnesium-L-pidolaat
pl: L-pidolan magnezu
pt: L-pidolato de magnésio
ro: L-pidolat de magneziu
sk: L-pidolát horečnatý
sl: magnezijev L-pidolat
sv: magnesium-L-pidolat

en: magnesium potassium citrate
bg: Магнезиево-калиев цитрат
cs: citronan draselno-hořečnatý
de: Magnesiumkaliumcitrat
el: κιτρικό καλιομαγνήσιο
es: citrato de magnesio y potasio
et: magneesiumkaaliumtsitraat
fi: magnesiumkaliumsitraatti
fr: citrate potassium-magnésium
hu: magnézium-kálium-citrát
it: citrato di potassio e magnesio
lt: magnio kalio citratas
lv: magnija kālija citrāts
mt: ċitrat tal-potassju tal-manjesju
nl: kaliummagnesiumcitraat
pl: cytrynian magnezu-potasu
pt: citrato de magnésio e potássio
ro: citrat de magneziu și potasiu
sk: citran horečnato-draselný
sl: magnezijev kalijev citrat
sv: magnesiumkaliumcitrat

en: magnesium citrate
da: magnesiumcitrat
de: Magnesiumcitrat, Magnesiumcitrate
el: κιτρικό μαγνήσιο
eo: magnezia citrato
es: citrato de magnesio
fa: منیزیم سیترات
fi: magnesiumsitraatti
fr: citrate de magnésium
it: citrato di magnesio
nl: Magnesiumcitraat
pt: citrato de magnésio
sh: Magnezijum citrat
sk: Citrát horečnatý
sr: Magnezijum citrat
sv: magnesiumcitrat
tr: Magnezyum sitrat

en: iron
af: yster
am: ብረት
an: Fierro
ar: حديد
as: লো
az: Dəmir
ba: Тимер
be: Жалеза
bg: Желязо
bi: Aean
bn: লোহা
bo: ལྕགས།
br: Houarn
bs: željezo
ca: ferro
ce: Железо
co: Ferru
cs: Železo
cv: Тимĕр
cy: Haearn
da: jern
de: Eisen
dv: ދަގަނޑު
el: Σίδηρος
eo: fero
es: Hierro
et: Raud
eu: burdina
fa: آهن
fi: Rauta, Rautaa
fo: Jarn
fr: Fer
fy: Izer
ga: Iarann
gd: Iarann
gl: Ferro
gn: Itakandua
gu: લોખંડ
gv: Yiarn
he: ברזל
hi: लोहा
hr: vas
ht: Fè
hu: Vas
hy: երկաթ
ia: ferro
id: Besi
ie: Ferre
io: fero
is: járn
it: Ferro
ja: 鉄
jv: Wesi
ka: რკინა
kg: Kibende
ki: Iron
kk: Темір
kn: ಕಬ್ಬಿಣ
ko: 철
ku: Hesin
kv: Кӧрт
kw: Horn
ky: Темир
la: ferrum
lb: Eisen
li: Iezer
ln: Ebendé
lt: Geležis
lv: Dzelzs
mg: Vy
mi: rino
mk: железо
ml: ഇരുമ്പ്
mn: Төмөр
mr: लोखंड
ms: Besi
mt: ħadid
my: သံ
nb: jern
ne: फलाम
nl: IJzer
nn: jern
nv: Béésh
oc: Fèrre
or: ଲୌହ
os: Æфсæйнаг
pa: ਲੋਹਾ
pl: Żelazo
ps: اوسپنه
pt: Ferro
qu: Khillay
ro: Fier
ru: железо
sa: अयः
sc: Ferru
sd: لوهه
sh: Željezo
si: යකඩ
sk: Železo
sl: Železo
so: Bir
sq: Hekuri
sr: гвожђе
su: Beusi
sv: Järn
sw: Chuma
ta: இரும்பு
te: ఇనుము
tg: Оҳан
th: เหล็ก
tl: Bakal
tr: Demir
tt: тимер
ud: Темир
ug: تۆمۈر
uk: залізо
ur: لوہا
uz: Temir
vi: sắt
vo: ferin
wa: Fier
yi: אייזן
yo: Iron
za: Diet
zh: 铁

en: ferrous carbonate, iron carbonate
bg: Железен карбонат
cs: uhličitan železnatý
de: Eisencarbonat
el: ανθρακικός σίδηρος
es: carbonato ferroso
et: raud(II)karbonaat
fi: ferrokarbonaatti
fr: carbonate ferreux, carbonate de fer
hu: vas(II)-karbonát
it: carbonato ferroso
lt: geležies (II) karbonatas
lv: dzelzs karbonāts
mt: karbunat ferruż
nl: ijzer (II) carbonaat, ijzer(II)fumaraat
pl: węglan żelaza(II)
pt: carbonato ferroso
ro: carbonat feros
sk: uhličitan železnatý
sl: železov karbonat
sv: ferrokarbonat

en: ferrous citrate, iron citrate
bg: Железен цитрат
cs: citrát železnatý
de: Eisencitrat
el: κιτρικός σίδηρος
es: citrato ferroso
et: raud(II)tsitraat
fi: ferrositraatti
fr: citrate ferreux, citrate de fer
hu: vas(II)-citrát
it: citrato ferroso
ja: クエン酸鉄
lt: geležies (II) citratas
lv: dzelzs citrāts
mt: ċitrat ferruż
nl: ijzer (II) citraat
pl: cytrynian żelaza(II)
pt: citrato ferroso
ro: citrat feros
sk: citran železnatý
sl: železov citrat
sv: ferrocitrat

en: ferric ammonium citrate, ammonium ferric citrate
bg: Железен амониев цитрат
cs: citrát železito-amonný
de: Ammoniumeisen-III-citrat, Ammoniumeisenzitrat, Ammoniumeisencitrat, Ferriammoniumcitrat, Eisenammoniumcitrat
el: εναμμώνιος κιτρικός σίδηρος
es: citrato férrico de amonio
et: raud-III-ammooniumtsitraat
fi: Ammoniumrautasitraatti, Ammoniumrautasitraattia
fr: citrate ferrique d’ammonium, Citrate d'ammonium ferrique vert, Citrate d'ammonium ferrique
hu: vas-III-ammónium-citrát
it: citrato ferrico di ammonio
ja: クエン酸鉄アンモニウム
lt: geležies amonio citratas
lv: dzelzs amonija citrāts
mt: ċitrat ferriku tal-ammonju
nl: ijzer-III-ammoniumcitraat
pl: cytrynian amonu i żelaza-III
pt: citrato férrico de amónio
ro: citrat feric de amoniu
sk: citran amónno-železitý
sl: železov amonijev citrat
sv: ferriammoniumcitrat

en: iron gluconate, ferrous gluconate
ar: غلوكونات الحديد الثنائي
bg: Феро глюконат
cs: Glukonan železnatý
da: Ferrogluconat
de: Eisengluconat, Eisen-II-gluconat
el: Γλυκονικος σιδηρος
es: Gluconato ferroso
et: Ferroglükonaat
fa: گلوکونات آهن
fi: Ferroglukonaatti
fr: gluconate de fer, gluconate ferreux
hr: željezov glukonat
hu: Vas-glukonát
it: gluconato di ferro, Gluconato ferroso
ja: グルコン酸第一鉄, グルコン酸鉄
lt: Geležies gliukonatas
lv: Dzelzs glikonāts
mt: Glukonat ferruż
nl: Ijzergluconaat
pl: Glukonian żelazawy
pt: Gluconato ferroso
ro: Gluconat feros
ru: глюконат железа
sh: Gvožđe glukonat
sk: Glukonan železnatý
sl: Železov glukonat
sr: Gvožđe glukonat
sv: Järnglukonat
tr: ferrous gluconate

en: iron fumarate, iron(II) fumarate, ferrous fumarate
ar: فومارات الحديد الثنائي
bg: Железен фумарат
cs: fumaran železnatý
de: Eisenfumarat
el: φουμαρικός σίδηρος
es: fumarato ferroso
et: raud(II)fumaraat
fa: آهن(II) فیومارات
fi: ferrofumaraatti
fr: fumarate ferreux, fumarate de fer
hu: vas(II)-fumarát
it: fumarato ferroso
lt: geležies (II) fumaratas
lv: dzelzs fumarāts
mt: fumarat ferruż
nl: ijzerfumaraat
pl: fumaran żelaza(II)
pt: fumarato ferroso
ro: fumarat feros
sh: Gvožđe(II) fumarat
sk: fumaran železnatý
sl: železov fumarat
sr: Gvožđe(II) fumarat
sv: ferrofumarat, järnfumarat, järn(II)fumarat
zh: 延胡索酸亚铁

en: ferric sodium diphosphate
bg: Натриево-железен дифосфат
cs: difosforečnan sodno-železitý
de: Eisennatriumdiphosphat
el: διφωσφορικό σιδηρονάτριο
es: difosfato férrico de sodio
et: raud(III)naatriumdifosfaat
fi: ferrinatriumdifosfaatti
fr: diphosphate ferrique de sodium
hu: vas(III)-nátrium-difoszfát
it: difosfato ferrico di sodio
lt: geležies natrio difosfatas
lv: dzelzs nātrija difosfāts
mt: difosfat ferriku tas-sodju
nl: natriumijzer (III) difosfaat
pl: difosforan sodu-żelaza(III)
pt: difosfato férrico de sódio
ro: difosfat feric de sodiu
sk: difosforečnan železito-sodný
sl: železov natrijev difosfat
sv: natriumferridifosfat

en: ferrous lactate, iron lactate
bg: Железен лактат
cs: mléčnan železnatý
de: Eisenlactat
el: γαλακτικός σίδηρος
es: lactato ferroso
et: raud(II)laktaat
fi: ferrolaktaatti
fr: lactate ferreux, lactate de fer
hu: vas(II)-laktát
it: lattato ferroso
ja: 乳酸鉄
lt: geležies (II) laktatas
lv: dzelzs laktāts
mt: laktat ferruż
nl: ijzer (II) lactaat
pl: mleczan żelaza(II)
pt: lactato ferroso
ro: lactat feros
sk: mliečnan železnatý
sl: železov laktat
sv: ferrolaktat

en: ferrous sulfate, iron sulfate
xx: 3b103, 3b104
ar: كبريتات الحديد الثنائي
bg: Железен сулфат
ca: sulfat de ferro
cs: síran železnatý
de: Eisensulfat
el: θειικός σίδηρος
es: sulfato ferroso
et: raudsulfaat
fa: فروس سولفات
fi: ferrosulfaatti
fr: sulfate de fer, sulfates de fer, sulfate ferreux
hr: Željezov sulfat
hu: vas-szulfát
id: Besi sulfat
it: solfato di ferro
ja: 硫酸鉄, 硫酸第一鉄
ko: 황산 철
lt: geležies sulfatas
lv: dzelzs sulfāts
mt: sulfat ferruż
nb: Jernsulfat
nl: ijzersulfaat
pl: siarczan żelaza
pt: sulfato ferroso
qu: Kachina
ro: sulfat feros
ru: сульфат железа
sh: Željezov sulfat
sk: síran železnatý
sl: železov sulfat
sr: гвожђе сулфат
sv: ferrosulfat
ta: அன்னபேதி
te: అన్నభేది
th: ไอร์ออนซัลเฟต
uk: Сульфат заліза
vi: Sắt sulfat
zh: 硫酸亚铁

en: ferrous ammonium phosphate
bg: Железен амониев фосфат
cs: fosforečnan železnatoamonný
de: Eisenammoniumphosphat
el: εναμμώνιος φωσφορικός σίδηρος
es: fosfato de amonio ferroso
et: raud(II)ammooniumfosfaat
fi: rauta-II-ammoniumfosfaatti
fr: phosphate d’ammonium ferreux, orthophosphate d’ammonium ferreux
hu: Vas(II)-ammónium-foszfát
it: fosfato ferroso di ammonio
lt: geležies (II) amonio fosfatas
lv: dzelzs amonija fosfāts
mt: fosfat ferruż tal-ammonju
nl: ammoniumijzer (II) fosfaat
pl: fosforan amonu żelaza(II)
pt: fosfato de amónio ferroso
ro: fosfat feros de amoniu
sk: fosforečnan amónno-železnatý
sl: železov amonijev fosfat
sv: järnammoniumfosfat

en: ferric sodium EDTA
bg: Желязно-натриев етилендиаминтетраацетат (EDTA)
cs: železito-sodná sůl EDTA
de: Eisen-Natrium-EDTA
el: άλας σιδήρου και νατρίου του EDTA
es: EDTA férrico sódico
et: raud(III)naatrium-EDTA
fi: rauta(III)natrium-EDTA
fr: ferédétate de sodium
hu: Vas(III)-nátrium-EDTA
it: EDTA ferrico sodico
lt: geležies natrio (EDTA)
lv: dzelzs-nātrija-EDTA
mt: EDTA ferriku tas-sodju
nl: natriumijzer-EDTA
pl: sól sodu i żelaza(II) EDTA
pt: EDTA de sódio férrico
ro: EDTA feric de sodiu
sk: železito-sodná soľ kyseliny EDTA
sl: železov natrijev EDTA
sv: järn(III)natrium-EDTA